trunk/apertium-es-ssp/apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 2
	Entries: 2834
	Sdefs: 80
	Paradigms: 55<pardef n="el__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz0123456789</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="advtmp" /> 
    <sdef n="advtmpps" /> 
    <sdef n="advtmppr" /> 
    <sdef n="advtmpft" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" />
    <sdef n="predet" />
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vaux" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="gen" /> 
    <sdef n="nom" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="GD" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="num2" /> 
    <sdef n="num3" /> 
    <sdef n="num4" /> 
    <sdef n="num5" /> 
    <sdef n="num6" /> 
    <sdef n="num7" /> 
    <sdef n="num8" /> 
    <sdef n="num9" /> 
    <sdef n="num10" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="sent"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
      <re>,</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cm"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="emails">
    <e>
      <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="urls">
    <e>
      <re>((www.)[a-z\-]+[.][a-z]+)</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ip">
    <e>
      <re>(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9])(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="web"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
</pardef>


    <pardef n="Susana__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ilamamuwy__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ilamamuwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ilamamuwyb</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>il2miwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num2"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>il3miwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num3"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>il4miwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num4"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>il5miwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num5"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5miha:1mijwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num6"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5miha:2mijwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num7"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5miha:3mijwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num8"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5miha:4mijwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num9"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5miha:5mijwy</l> 
        <r>ilamamuwy<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num10"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

</pardef>

 
 <pardef n="olepui__dem">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>olepui</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eilememuwy</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>2memadohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num2"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>3memadohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num3"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>4memadohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num4"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>5memadohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num5"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5memahy:1memajdohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num6"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5memahy:2memajdohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num7"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5memahy:3memajdohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num8"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5memahy:4memajdohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num9"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s5memahy:5memajdohb</l> 
        <r>olepui<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="num10"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>

<e lm="olepui"><par n="olepui__dem"/></e>
<e lm="ilamamuwy"><par n="/ilamamuwy__n"/></e>
<e lm="Susana"><i>Susana</i><par n="Susana__np"/></e>
<e><par n="pardret"/></e>
<e><par n="separ"/></e>
<e><par n="numeros"/></e>
<e><par n="urls"/></e>
<e><par n="emails"/></e>
<e><par n="paresq"/></e>
<e><par n="coma"/></e>
<e><par n="ip"/></e>
<e><par n="separa"/></e>
